District of Columbia statutes.
2-1376

Transition provisions.

(a)

The Commission shall commence operations, and the Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs established pursuant to Mayor’s Order 95-119 shall be abolished, on April 17, 2008. The members of the Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs established pursuant to Mayor’s Order 95-119 shall hold over as members of the Commission until new members are appointed pursuant to § 2-1374.

(b)

All records and functions of the Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs established pursuant to Mayor’s Order 95-119 shall be transferred to the Commission on April 17, 2008.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 307, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 312(b), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 307 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).